Utah statutes.
13-14b-105.   Relief.

(1)  A dealer may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to obtain payment of a warranty claim submitted under this chapter to a supplier if a supplier:

(a)  fails to make payment in accordance with the provisions of this chapter;

(b)  wrongfully rejects the dealer's warranty claim; or

(c)  violates any other provision of this chapter.

(2)  The court shall award the dealer costs and reasonable attorney's fees if it finds that the supplier has committed a violation under Subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c).



Enacted by Chapter 225, 2003 General Session

